Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1968.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3260 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, in


consultation with the State Board of Career and Technology


Education, shall adopt a policy allowing institutions within The


Oklahoma State System of Higher Education to grant college credit


for courses taken at technology center school districts under the


authority of the State Board of Career and Technology Education.


B. The policy adopted pursuant to subsection A of this section


shall provide for:



Req. No. 3042 Page 1


1. Transcription of college credit earned for a course taken at


a technology center school district;


2. A transfer equivalency matrix of technology center school


district courses eligible for college credit; and


3. Requirements for technology center school district faculty


teaching courses that are eligible for college credit.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3042 EB 1/15/2026 9:18:18 AM























Req. No. 3042 Page 2